Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-9] Disclosure of content of
electronic communications of principal. To the extent a power of attorney
expressly grants an agent authority over the content of electronic
communications sent or received by the principal and unless directed otherwise
by the principal or the court, a custodian shall disclose to the agent the
content if the agent gives the custodian:

(1) A written request for disclosure in physical or
electronic form;

(2) An original or copy of the power of attorney
expressly granting the agent authority over the content of electronic
communications of the principal;

(3) A certification by the agent, under penalty of
perjury, that the power of attorney is in effect; and

(4) If requested by the custodian:

(A) A number, username, address, or other
unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify
the principal's account; or

(B) Evidence linking the account to the
principal. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next